local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
    <pardef n="нос/и__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>иш</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>име</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>евме</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>евте</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еа</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="глед/а__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ам</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>аш</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>аме</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ате</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>аат</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="нула__num">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l/>
	  <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   <pardef n="сел/о__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>о</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="ед/ен__num">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ен</l>
         <r>ен<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>на</l>
         <r>ен<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>но</l>
         <r>ен<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="дв/а__num">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>е</l>
         <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- придавки -->

    <pardef n="висок__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="летачк/и__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="доб/ар__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ар</l>
          <r>ар<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ра</l>
          <r>ар<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ро</l>
          <r>ар<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ри</l>
          <r>ар<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


   <pardef n="ко/ј__adj">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ј</l>
         <r>ј<s n="adj"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ја</l>
         <r>ј<s n="adj"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>е</l>
         <r>ј<s n="adj"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>ј<s n="adj"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>


    <!-- предлози -->

    <pardef n="и__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="в__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="не__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="не__pref">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>не</l>
	  <r>не<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r/>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 </pardefs>

   <e lm="гледа"><i>глед</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="очекува"><i>очекув</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="чека"><i>чек</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="смета"><i>смет</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="калкулира"><i>калкулир</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="игра"><i>игр</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="бара"><i>бар</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="сака"><i>сак</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="добива"><i>добив</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="победува"><i>победув</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="носи"><i>нос</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="оди"><i>од</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="прави"><i>прав</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="мисли"><i>мисл</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="работи"><i>работ</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="стои"><i>сто</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="љуби"><i>љуб</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="еден"><i>ед</i><par n="ед/ен__num"/></e>
   <e lm="два"><i>дв</i><par n="дв/а__num"/></e>
   <e lm="нула"><i>нула</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="три"><i>три</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="четири"><i>четири</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="пет"><i>пет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="шест"><i>шест</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="седум"><i>седум</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="осум"><i>осум</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="девет"><i>девет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="десет"><i>десет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="единаесет"><i>единаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="дванаесет"><i>дванаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="тринаесет"><i>тринаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="четирнаест"><i>четирнаест</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="петнаесет"><i>петнаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="шеснаесет"><i>шеснаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="седумнаесет"><i>седумнаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="осумнаесет"><i>осумнаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="деветнаесет"><i>деветнаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="дваесет"><i>дваесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="висок"><i>висок</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="румен"><i>румен</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="нов"><i>нов</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="убав"><i>убав</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="нов"><i>нов</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="летачки"><i>летачк</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="добар"><i>доб</i><par n="доб/ар__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="в"><i>в</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="во"><i>во</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="за"><i>за</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="кај"><i>кај</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="на"><i>на</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="од"><i>од</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="со"><i>со</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="без"><i>без</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="околу"><i>околу</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="по"><i>по</i><par n="в__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="и"><i>и</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="а"><i>а</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="или"><i>или</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="не"><i>не</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="каде"><i>каде</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="како"><i>како</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="кога"><i>кога</i><par n="не__adv"/></e>
